Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 65 Guardians Generally
28-65-305. Actions — Service of process.

When there is a guardian of the estate, all actions between the ward or the guardian and third persons in which it is sought to charge or to benefit the estate of the ward shall be prosecuted by or against the guardian of the estate as guardian, and the guardian shall represent the interests of the ward in the action.

In every case, process shall be served upon the guardian of the estate and in addition upon such other persons as by law required.

Cross References. Right to bring action, §16-61-101 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Matthew L. Brunson, Family Law—Providing for Those Who Cannot Provide for Themselves: A Proposal for the Arkansas General Assembly to Follow in the Footsteps of an Already Expansive Guardianship Law and Grant Guardians the Right to File for Divorce on Behalf of a Ward, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 271 (2016).

In light of the public policy favoring arbitration and the Legislature's decision to refrain from specifically limiting a guardian's ability to enter into arbitration agreements, a guardian of a patient's person and the patient's estate possessed the authority to enter into an arbitration agreement with a nursing home on behalf of the patient; therefore, the nursing home's motion to compel arbitration should have been granted.GGNSC Holdings, LLC v. Lamb, 2016 Ark. 101, 487 S.W.3d 348 (2016).

A guardian could not compromise a ward's suit without the sanction of a probate court. Rankin v. Schofield, 70 Ark. 83, 66 S.W. 197, 70 S.W. 306 (1902) (decision under prior law).

Because plaintiff individual was not the proper party to pursue the tort claims against defendants due to her incompetency, and she did not move to substitute the proper party after being put on notice of the need for substitution, the district court did not err in dismissing the claims.Kuelbs v. Hill, 615 F.3d 1037 (8th Cir. 2010), cert. denied, 562 U.S. 1287, 131 S. Ct. 1679, 179 L. Ed. 2d 616 (2011).

Where a parent brought a suit in his own name to recover a horse alleged to belong to his infant son, it was not error to refuse to permit him to amend the complaint to allege a cause of action in favor of the son by the plaintiff as his natural guardian, as the proposed amendment would have the effect of bringing a new cause of action. Irby v. Dowdy, 139 Ark. 299, 213 S.W. 739 (1919) (decision under prior law).

Where a probate court appointed a guardian for an elderly lady upon the finding that she “was suffering from hypertension, arteriosclerosis and cardiovascular disease and was not physically able to see after her large number of rent houses and farm property,” this finding did not preclude her from testifying in an action brought by her guardian when she appeared to be in full control of her mental faculties when she appeared in court. Parker v. Walrath, 232 Ark. 585, 339 S.W.2d 121 (1960) (decision under prior law).

Where an automobile was assigned to another party prior to the time the party so assigning was put under guardianship, there was a completed gift and former similar statute had no application. Parker v. Walrath, 232 Ark. 585, 339 S.W.2d 121 (1960) (decision under prior law).

The provisions of §18-12-403 declaring that no instrument affecting homestead is valid unless signed by wife was held applicable also to an insane wife not under guardianship, since §18-12-403 has never been amended or repealed. Penney v. Vessells, 221 Ark. 389, 253 S.W.2d 968 (1952) (decision under prior law).

It was proper for a trial court to dismiss a complaint filed in the name of a ward by the guardian of the estate on testimony presented in court by the ward. Parker v. Walrath, 232 Ark. 585, 339 S.W.2d 121 (1960) (decision under prior law).

It is specifically recognized that the operation of any business undertaking involves hazards, chance, and danger of loss. In recognition of this fact, it is declared to be the legislative intent that no guardian shall be held personally liable for loss resulting from mere lack of familiarity with the business operations, mistakes of judgment made in good faith, or like causes.

In a case involving the management of an estate, a trial court erred by determining that certain expenditures of behalf of a ward were improper; the guardian was allowed to make gifts on behalf of the ward under subsection (b) of this section, he could continue the ward's practice of supporting family members, continuing donations to the ward's church was acceptable, and expenditures for food and clothing fell within the definition of what was required for maintenance. The law of trusts guided the evaluation of the duties and liabilities of the guardian of an estate.Stautzenberger v. Stautzenberger, 2013 Ark. 148, 427 S.W.3d 17 (2013).

The word “obligation” was used in former statute in the sense of liability either created by contract or by operation of law. Phillips v. Phillips, 203 Ark. 481, 158 S.W.2d 20 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Guardians were authorized to execute valid mortgages on their ward's lands for educational purposes. Rightsell v. Carpenter, 188 Ark. 21, 64 S.W.2d 101 (1933) (decision under prior law).

If payments are made to another under the order of the court, the guardian of the estate is not bound to see to the application of the payments.

There could be no valid objection to a court's approval of the payment of approximately $15.00 per month to a hospital to be used for a ward's personal needs pursuant to the provisions of former similar statute. Omohundro v. Patty, 230 Ark. 252, 321 S.W.2d 746 (1959) (decision under prior law).

Once a child reaches majority and is physically and mentally normal, the legal duty of the parents to support that child ceases; that duty cannot be reimposed later if the adult child becomes disabled and needs support. Towery v. Towery, 285 Ark. 113, 685 S.W.2d 155 (1985) (decision under prior law).

Where a widow was appointed administrator of her husband's estate as well as guardian for his minor children and made no regular reports of her administration and her guardianship, but it was an undisputed fact that she and her wards had their living out of the income of the land, which was all of the estate, and this was barely sufficient, though expenditures were made without an order of the probate court, she was entitled to have credit for the living expenses of the wards not exceeding the clear income of the rents and the actual value of the necessities furnished. Shell v. Sheets, 202 Ark. 708, 152 S.W.2d 301 (1941) (decision under prior law).

Where a mother erroneously concluded that a minor's marriage emancipated him and that his signed receipt cleared her of liability as his guardian with respect to the father's estate, although the minor was not bound by the signed receipt, and the guardian, before expending the corpus, failed to obtain prior authorization and to file regular reports of expenditures, as required by law, a probate court could properly apply such charges against the minor's claim against his mother-guardian's estate. Shinley v. Ricks, 234 Ark. 767, 354 S.W.2d 547 (1962) (decision under prior law).

A trial court had the power and authority to allow a guardian credit for various amounts expended out of corpus of a ward's estate for maintenance and education of the ward without a prior probate court order to make such expenditures. Robinson v. Hammons, 228 Ark. 329, 307 S.W.2d 857 (1957) (decision under prior law).

Where a guardian paid himself $338 from a ward's estate without prior court approval, a probate court was justified in allowing such a claim as a credit where the ward ratified the payment after coming of age. Robinson v. Hammons, 228 Ark. 329, 307 S.W.2d 857 (1957) (decision under prior law).

Cross References. Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, §9-17-101 et seq.

A parent had the obligation to support a minor child, and no request for support was necessary. Dangelo v. Neil, 10 Ark. App. 119, 661 S.W.2d 448 (1983) (decision under prior law).

While a trial court had authority under former similar statute to allow credits to a guardian for expenditures from the corpus of a ward's estate though it was not authorized by a previous court order, a guardian making such expenditures did so at his own risk. Robinson v. Hammons, 228 Ark. 329, 307 S.W.2d 857 (1957) (decision under prior law).

A parent had to furnish the support and maintenance for his child himself and the duty was a personal one; the parent could not rely upon the assurance that someone else was properly supporting and maintaining the child to avoid the impact of §9-9-207 providing for adoption of his child without his consent because of his failure to support the child. Pender v. McKee, 266 Ark. 18, 582 S.W.2d 929 (1979) (decision under prior law).

Although a father had failed significantly for a period of one year to support his child without justifiable cause, that fact did not preclude him from objecting to a proposed adoption or from being fully heard in the matter; rather, it meant that he could not defeat the adoption by simply withholding his consent. Watkins v. Dudgeon, 270 Ark. 516, 606 S.W.2d 78 (Ct. App. 1980) (decision under prior law).

A guardian was required to obtain a court order before paying for the funeral of a ward's father out of ward's money. Russell v. Johnson, 193 Ark. 541, 101 S.W.2d 172 (1937) (decision under prior law).

A guardian had no authority to invade the principal of his ward's estate without first obtaining an order of a probate court. Campbell v. Clark, 63 Ark. 450, 39 S.W. 262 (1897); Hudson v. Newton, 83 Ark. 223, 103 S.W. 170 (1907); France v. Shockey, 92 Ark. 41, 121 S.W. 1056 (1909); Thomas v. Thomas, 126 Ark. 579, 191 S.W. 227 (1917); Diffie v. Anderson, 137 Ark. 151, 208 S.W. 428 (1919) (decisions under prior law).

The circuit court's power to review and conclude, subject to appeal, whether the money is “accessible”, under whatever state or federal regulations may apply, does not mean that the circuit court has the authority to determine how a guardian is to use a ward's funds; that decision lies exclusively within the jurisdiction of the probate court according to §28-65-107(a). Another provision subdivision (c)(3) of this section, deals with the probate court's authority to invade the principal of a minor ward's estate to provide for support. In re Porter, 298 Ark. 121, 765 S.W.2d 944 (1989).

A mother's obligations to her child for support did not come into existence only when the father was impoverished. Barnhard v. Barnhard, 252 Ark. 167, 477 S.W.2d 845 (1972) (decision under prior law).

An agreement by the mother to pay child support to her husband following a divorce was not invalid as being inequitable and contrary to public policy on the grounds that the agreement relieved the father of his obligation to support his children, since the obligation belonged to both parents. Barnhard v. Barnhard, 252 Ark. 167, 477 S.W.2d 845 (1972) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had power to authorize the guardian of a mentally incompetent veteran to purchase a house for the ward and his dependent family and pay for the house out of the proceeds of the ward's estate. United States Fid. & Guar. Co. v. Chambers, 204 Ark. 81, 160 S.W.2d 888 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Where a provision in divorce decree for daughter's support until she became employed and self-supporting was contractual and father actually supported her past her majority, her refusal to accept employment offered, which would have made her self-supporting, relieved the father from further support. Worthington v. Worthington, 207 Ark. 185, 179 S.W.2d 648 (1944) (decision under prior law).

Bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness which are the direct obligations of, or the principal and income of which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States;

Bonds or notes issued by the State of Arkansas;

Arkansas State Board of Education bonds issued under Acts 1937, No. 162 [repealed];

Bonds issued by a county, city, incorporated town, or improvement district of the State of Arkansas, whether the bonds are the general obligation of the issuer or are payable out of a special fund, as long as the bonds are negotiable instruments under the law;

Bonds issued by a school district of the State of Arkansas;

Shares, share accounts, or accounts of any building and loan association organized under the laws of the State of Arkansas, of any federal savings and loan association domiciled in the State of Arkansas which are insured by the Savings Association Insurance Fund, or of any credit union in Arkansas, for their eligible members, which are insured by the National Credit Union Administration.

However, no such investment shall exceed the amounts so insured.

Provided, nothing herein shall be construed to expand the field of membership of any credit union;

Notes, bonds, debentures, or other similar obligations issued by federal land banks, federal intermediate credit banks, or banks for cooperatives, or any other obligations issued pursuant to the provisions of an Act of Congress of the United States known as the Farm Credit Act of 1971 and acts amendatory thereto;

Bonds issued by a national mortgage association;

Notes or bonds secured by mortgage or deed of trust which the Federal Housing Administration has insured or has made a commitment to insure;

Notes or bonds secured fully as to principal and interest by a first mortgage or deed of trust upon improved or timbered real property located in the State of Arkansas in which provision is made for regular periodic payments on the principal, at least annually, sufficient in amount to amortize the indebtedness during a period not exceeding fifteen (15) years. These notes or bonds are to be in an amount not exceeding sixty-five percent (65%) of the value of the real property security as determined by an appraisal thereof approved by the court;

Bonds, notes, debentures, or other direct obligations of a state, county, or city located without the State of Arkansas but within the United States, or of a corporation incorporated under the laws of the United States or of any state of the United States or of the District of Columbia which, at the time of the purchase, shall be rated in either the highest or next-highest classification established by at least two (2) nationally recognized standard financial rating services;

Shares of any open-end or closed-end management-type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, the portfolio of which is limited to the securities described in subdivisions (b)(1)-(11) of this section and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by such securities, provided that the investment company or investment trust takes delivery of the collateral either directly or through an authorized custodian;

Contracts for annuities or for life, health, or accident insurance on the person of the ward, or of another in whom the ward has an insurable interest, or a combination of any such contracts, if the contract is payable to the ward or to his or her estate, is in the usual form, and is issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in the State of Arkansas. Any such contract shall reserve the right in the ward to change the beneficiary thereof after the termination of his or her incompetency;

Shares or interests in any common trust fund investing in common stocks or preferred stocks listed on a national securities exchange maintained by a guardian which is a state or national bank or trust company authorized by the provisions of §§ 28-69-201 — 28-69-204 to establish and maintain common trust funds; or

Shares, securities, or other interests in an open-end or closed-end management-type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2015, or an exchange-traded fund listed on a national securities exchange.

Direct obligations of, or obligations unconditionally guaranteed as to principal and income by, the United States;

Bonds issued by the State of Arkansas;

Shares of any investment company or investment trust described in subdivision (b)(12) of this section, the portfolio of which is limited to the securities described in subdivisions (c)(1)(A) and (B) of this section and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by such securities, provided that the investment company or investment trust takes delivery of the collateral either directly or through an authorized custodian;

Bonds issued by a school district in this state;

Notes, bonds, debentures, or other similar obligations issued by a federal land bank, a federal intermediate credit bank, a bank for a cooperative, or any other obligation issued under the Farm Credit Act of 1971, 12 U.S.C. § 2001 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2019;

Bonds issued by a national mortgage association;

A certificate of deposit or another interest-bearing deposit account of a bank domiciled in this state that is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

However, an investment in a certificate of deposit or an interest-bearing deposit account shall not exceed the amount insured; or

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (b)(15); inserted designation (d)(1); added “the guardian may invest the ward’s funds without prior order of the court in” at the end of the introductory language in (d); rewrote (d)(1); and added (d)(2) and (3).

The 2019 amendment added (c)(1)(D) through (c)(1)(H).

U.S. Code. The Farm Credit Act of 1971, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 12 U.S.C. § 2001 et seq.

The Investment Company Act of 1940, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.

Cross References. Prudent investor rule for investments, §28-71-105.

Where a guardian, after being ordered by a probate court to lend out his ward's money, waited for 10 years without lending the money and without making any reports to the court of his failure to do so, it was not error, after allowing him reasonable time to make the loan after being ordered to do so, to charge him with interest thereafter at the legal rate. Merritt v. Wallace, 76 Ark. 217, 88 S.W. 876 (1905) (decision under prior law).

Section 4-57-101(c) was held to have no applicability to cases in which fiduciaries, upon equitable principles, became chargeable with compound interest, and probate courts had the same discretion to compound interest as to fiduciaries under their supervision as appertained to a chancellor. Price v. Peterson, 38 Ark. 494 (1882) (decision under prior law).

If a trustee exercised proper care and diligence, he was not responsible for mere error or mistake of judgment. First Nat'l Bank v. Hawley, 207 Ark. 587, 182 S.W.2d 194 (1944) (decision under prior law).

A curator was not liable for the failure to keep money loaned at all times where the security offered was rejected by a probate court if he had used reasonable care in trying to lend the money and in obtaining proper security therefor, and the curator was therefore not liable for any deficiency in interest because he deposited money in a bank at four percent interest which was as high or higher than he would have obtained on government bonds. Lee v. Beauchamp, 175 Ark. 716, 300 S.W. 401 (1927) (decision under prior law).

Where a guardian was unable to lend his ward's money on realty, he could deposit the money in a bank, provided interest was agreed to be paid at a rate which was as high or higher than could be obtained on bonds of the United States. McCown v. Edwards, 185 Ark. 620, 48 S.W.2d 558 (1932) (decision under prior law).

Though a guardian, without an order of a probate court, loaned money of his wards at 10 percent, but upon insufficient security, he would be charged with interest at the legal rate only in the absence of proof that he could have obtained a higher rate upon sufficient security. Parker v. Wilson, 98 Ark. 553, 136 S.W. 981 (1911) (decision under prior law).

Statutes which enumerate the investments which trustees may make were held to be construed as permissive, intended to provide for situations where the instrument creating the trust did not otherwise provide and did not prohibit other investments which could be authorized by the trust instrument. State Nat'l Bank v. Murphy, 207 Ark. 263, 180 S.W.2d 118 (1944) (decision under prior law).

Where a testator had clothed trustee with the power to make such investments and reinvestments as the trustee, from time to time, deemed safe and desirable and had released the trustee from all liability for any mistake of judgment or losses that might occur in the management of the estate, the trustee was not restricted to particular investments listed by statute. State Nat'l Bank v. Murphy, 207 Ark. 263, 180 S.W.2d 118 (1944) (decision under prior law).

Where a testamentary trust directed that income be paid testator's dependents and authorized trustee to sell assets if income was not sufficient to pay specified sum, the trustee was not required to sell the stocks held by testator at his death and invest in so called “legals.” First Nat'l Bank v. Hawley, 207 Ark. 587, 182 S.W.2d 194 (1944) (decision under prior law).

Where a guardian loaned a ward's money without first obtaining a court order authorizing him to make the loan, he assumed the responsibility, and no subsequent order of the probate court confirming his action would relieve him from liability if a loss occurred. Parker v. Wilson, 98 Ark. 553, 136 S.W. 981 (1911) (decision under prior law).

Guardians who deposited their wards' funds in a bank over a long period without an order of a probate court became personally liable on the bank's insolvency. United States Veterans' Bureau v. Riddle, 186 Ark. 1071, 57 S.W.2d 826 (1933) (decision under prior law).

An allowance to a guardian of credit for loans made without direction of a court and without first mortgage security on real estate was held error. Allison v. Martindale, 187 Ark. 1102, 63 S.W.2d 986 (1933) (decision under prior law).

In view of regulations of United States Treasury Department, a court properly ordered the guardian of a living, but incompetent, co-owner of matured United States savings bonds, purchased by incompetent with his own money prior to a declaration of incompetency, to convert the bonds into cash and reinvest proceeds in the same manner as original bonds. Taylor v. Schlotfelt, 218 Ark. 589, 237 S.W.2d 890 (1951) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had the power to authorize the guardian of a mentally incompetent veteran to purchase a house for the ward and his dependent family and pay for the house out of the proceeds of the ward's estate. United States Fid. & Guar. Co. v. Chambers, 204 Ark. 81, 160 S.W.2d 888 (1942) (decision under prior law).

There was no authority giving a probate court the jurisdiction to order a guardian or curator to invest the funds in his hands of the estate of minors in real estate. Beakley v. Ford, 123 Ark. 383, 185 S.W. 796 (1916) (decision under prior law).

Shares, share certificates, share accounts, or accounts of a:

Building and loan association organized under the laws of this state;

Federal savings and loan association domiciled in this state and insured by the Savings Association Insurance Fund; or

(1)Credit union in this state for eligible members that is insured by the National Credit Union Administration.

However, an investment in shares, share certificates, share accounts, or accounts listed in subdivision (c)(1)(H)(i) of this section shall not exceed the amount insured.

If the guardian of the estate is a state or national bank or trust company authorized by the provisions of §§ 28-69-201 — 28-69-204 to establish and maintain common trust funds, the guardian may invest the ward's funds without prior order of the court in:

If it is in the best interest of the ward or his or her estate, the court may order the guardian of the estate to retain any property belonging to the ward which may come into the hands of the guardian otherwise than by purchase by the guardian, whether or not the property is of the nature authorized by § 28-65-311, as an investment of the ward's funds.

If the guardian of the estate makes an investment which at the time of the making thereof shall meet the requirements of § 28-65-311 and the investment later fails to meet the requirements, the guardian may retain the investment, unless otherwise directed by the court.

The court may authorize the purchase of real property in this state for use by the ward as a home or, unless he or she is an unmarried minor, as a home for his or her dependent family.

The purchase shall be made only upon order of the court after notice to the ward if he or she is fourteen (14) years of age or over and his or her incompetence is due solely to minority, and to such other persons, if any, as the court may direct.

(1)The real or personal property of the ward not excluding real property in which a minor or mentally incompetent ward has a vested homestead interest, or any part thereof or interest therein, may be sold, conveyed, released, mortgaged, leased, or exchanged or an easement thereon may be granted by the guardian of the estate upon such terms as the court may order for the purpose of paying the ward's debts, for providing for his or her care, maintenance, and education and the care, maintenance, and education of his or her dependents, or for investing the proceeds, or in any other case in which it is for the best interest of the ward.

(1)A guardian shall not purchase property of the ward unless sold at public sale and approved by the court, and then only if the guardian is a spouse, parent, child, brother, or sister of the ward and is a cotenant with the ward in the property.

The report of the special guardian shall also be subject to the approval of the court after notice to all interested parties is given and a hearing is held by the court.

Cross References. Deeds of guardians, §18-12-605.

Sales by guardians, taxes, and penalties to be discharged out of proceeds of sale, §26-35-303.

Sales of land in court proceedings not prohibited unless expressly forbidden by deed, will, or contract, §18-60-106.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Family Law, 14 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 799.

Where a guardian employed a broker to sell a ward's realty, the sale was upon the order and approval of the probate court, and the services were beneficial to the ward's estate, the ward's estate was liable for a commission since the guardian had a right to employ the services of a competent real estate agent to assist in the sale of the ward's property. Gordon v. Burns, 203 Ark. 13, 155 S.W.2d 588 (1941) (decision under prior law).

An order was not rendered void because it directed a sale for cash, since the court had the discretion to so order. Wells v. Floyd, 210 Ark. 980, 198 S.W.2d 412 (1946) (decision under prior law).

A sale by a guardian was not complete until confirmed by a court. Guynn v. McCauley, 32 Ark. 97 (1877); Thomason v. Craighead, 32 Ark. 391 (1877) (decisions under prior law).

A purchaser who acquired possession of land under an unconfirmed sale of minor's estate became liable for rents and profits. Ambleton v. Dyer, 53 Ark. 224, 13 S.W. 926 (1890) (decision under prior law).

A guardian's deed executed in pursuance of an unconfirmed guardian's sale passed no title. Alexander v. Hardin, 54 Ark. 480, 16 S.W. 264 (1891); Lumpkins v. Johnson, 61 Ark. 80, 32 S.W. 65 (1895) (decisions under prior law).

A guardian's sale confirmed upon application of a purchaser without guardian's or ward's presence was ineffective. Morrow v. James, 69 Ark. 539, 64 S.W. 269 (1901) (decision under prior law).

A court was without authority to confirm any sale of a minor's property which did not bring the required percent of the appraised value, and confirmation of the sale could not supply this failure. Simmons v. A.C. Carter & Co., 125 Ark. 547, 189 S.W. 176 (1916) (decision under prior law).

Trial court erred in finding that a husband's estate was entitled to specific performance of an agreement requiring his wife, an incapacitated person, to pay him in return for sole ownership of their rental properties because although the guardian of the wife's person and estate had the authority to convey her interest in real property, at the time of the husband's death, the deed had not been fully executed and delivered since the husband had not executed it, as a result, upon the husband's death, the rental properties were held by the husband and wife, the wife became the sole owner of the rental property, and the husband's estate had no interest in the property.Butcher v. Beatty, 2010 Ark. 130 (2010).

A probate court could not direct a guardian to exchange his ward's homestead for other lands. Gatlin v. Lafon, 95 Ark. 256, 129 S.W. 284 (1910) (decision under prior law).

The provision of §18-12-403 declaring that no instrument affecting a homestead was valid unless signed by the wife applied also to an insane wife not under guardianship, since this section has never been amended or repealed. Penney v. Vessells, 221 Ark. 389, 253 S.W.2d 968 (1952) (decision under prior law).

An order was not void because of the direction that the proceeds of the sale of land be invested in government bonds, which were understood to be interest-bearing obligations of the United States. Wells v. Floyd, 210 Ark. 980, 198 S.W.2d 412 (1946) (decision under prior law).

A lease, in order to be valid, had to be confirmed. Gaines v. Gaines, 116 Ark. 508, 173 S.W. 410 (1915) (decision under prior law).

A guardian should lease a ward's homestead. Booth v. Goodwin, 29 Ark. 633 (1874) (decision under prior law).

The rule caveat emptor was held applicable to guardian's sales, but if the guardian misrepresented the title to the purchaser, the latter would not be bound. Black v. Walton, 32 Ark. 321 (1877) (decision under prior law).

An order of a probate court for the sale of a minor's lands will be presumed to have been regularly made where nothing to the contrary appeared in the record, and its validity could not be questioned in a collateral proceeding. Currie v. Franklin, 51 Ark. 338, 11 S.W. 477 (1889) (decision under prior law).

When real estate was in the hands of a ward's ancestor, the guardian was only chargeable with rents actually received. Haden v. Swepston, 64 Ark. 477, 43 S.W. 393 (1897); Rhea v. Bagley, 66 Ark. 93, 49 S.W. 492 (1899) (decisions under prior law).

A probate court in which a guardianship of minors was pending could order the sale of a homestead left by ward's parents for ward's benefit. Merrill v. Harris, 65 Ark. 355, 46 S.W. 538 (1898) (decision under prior law).

A guardian could lease his ward's land for a term of years extending beyond the ward's minority. Beauchamp v. Bertig, 90 Ark. 351, 119 S.W. 75 (1909) (decision under prior law).

The probate sale of a minor's homestead by the guardian was absolutely void if the estate was in debt at the time. Rushing v. Horner, 130 Ark. 21, 196 S.W. 468 (1917) (decision under prior law).

A probate sale by a guardian of a minor's homestead inherited from his deceased father was void where the order of sale did not show that there were no debts existing against the minor's deceased father. Puckett v. Glendenning, 135 Ark. 551, 205 S.W. 454 (1918) (decision under prior law).

A minor's homestead could not be sold where the parent who owned the homestead at the time of his death owed debts. Smith v. Wofford, 222 Ark. 315, 259 S.W.2d 507 (1953) (decision under prior law).

A probate court did not abuse its discretion in refusing to set aside the sale of vacant lots by a guardian at $50.00 an acre offered by a buyer and appraised by persons suggested by the buyer merely because there had been a recent development in addition. Hamilton v. Northwest Land Co., 223 Ark. 831, 268 S.W.2d 877 (1954) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Reichenbach v. Kizer, 174 B.R. 997 (Bankr. E.D. Ark 1994).

Prior to or at the time of the approval of the sale of real or personal property made by a guardian, the court shall ascertain whether the guardian's bond is sufficient in amount and security to protect the estate of the ward with respect to the proceeds of the sale. If not, the court shall require that the guardian's bond be increased or supplemented in amount or security to adequately protect the ward's estate.

The provisions of §§ 28-51-105 — 28-51-109, 28-51-201 — 28-51-203, and 28-51-301 — 28-51-309, relative to decedents' estates, shall apply to sales, mortgages, leases, and exchanges of property of the ward of a guardian, except that the extent of the term of a lease of real property of a ward shall not be limited to three (3) years, nor shall the credit to be extended by the guardian be limited to one (1) year.

(1)The guardian of the estate of an incompetent who owns land situated in this state or an interest therein or who owns an interest in oil, gas, or other minerals in or under land situated in this state or in an oil, gas, or other mineral lease on the land on such terms as the guardian deems to be for the best interest of his or her ward and in the name and on behalf of his or her ward may:

Execute, acknowledge, and deliver a lease on the land or interest therein or of the minerals thereunder for the production of oil, gas, or other minerals from those lands;

Make an assignment of the interest in the lease owned by the ward;

Sell and convey the ward's interest in the oil, gas, or other minerals or mineral rights in and under the land or any part thereof; or

Enter into a contract with reference thereto.

Any such lease or assignment, sale, conveyance, or contract shall be binding upon the ward and his or her estate and all parties to the transaction unless set aside as provided in this section.

(1)Within sixty (60) days after the execution, acknowledgment, and delivery of the lease, assignment, conveyance, or contract, the guardian shall report the transaction to the circuit court of the county in which the land or the greater part of the land in area is situated, stating in detail the essential facts with reference to the transaction, attaching to his or her report a copy of the instrument executed by him or her, and praying for an order ratifying the transaction evidenced by the instrument.

(1)If the court finds that the execution of the instrument in question was for the best interest of the ward at the time it was executed and delivered, the court shall make an order approving and confirming the acts of the guardian in executing, acknowledging, and delivering the instrument.

If the court finds that the transaction reported by the guardian was not for the best interest of the ward at the time it was entered into, the court shall make an order setting aside the lease, assignment, sale, conveyance, or contract and requiring the guardian to return the consideration he or she may have received for the execution and delivery thereof.

If the court making the order is not the court in which the general guardianship proceedings are pending, the order shall direct that a certified copy of the order and the original of the supplemental bond, if any, with the court's approval endorsed thereon be transmitted promptly by registered mail by the clerk of that court to and filed with the clerk of the court in which the general guardianship proceedings are pending.

A guardian who fails to file a report and petition as required by the provisions of this section within the prescribed time shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be fined in any sum not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

If the guardian fails to file the report and petition as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the person with whom the guardian has contracted or to whom he or she has executed and delivered an assignment, lease, conveyance, or other instrument, after the expiration of sixty (60) days and within seventy-five (75) days after the date of the lease, assignment, conveyance, contract, or other instrument, may petition the court of the county in which the land or the greater part thereof in area is situated to require the guardian to file the report and petition.

It shall be the duty of the court to order the guardian to appear and show cause why his or her report and petition have not been filed.

After citation of the guardian to appear and after notice given to the other parties, if any, as the court may direct, the court shall determine whether or not the lease, assignment, sale, conveyance, or contract should be approved and confirmed and shall make an order approving and confirming the transaction or setting the transaction aside as provided in subsection (b) of this section, as in the judgment of the court may be required by the facts developed at the hearing.

A lease, assignment, sale, conveyance, or contract made by a guardian under the authority contained in this section that is not reported to the court as provided by subsection (b) or subsection (g) of this section shall be null and void after the expiration of the time provided for the filing of the petition to require the guardian to file his or her report and petition.

It was held to be a matter of common knowledge that it frequently becomes necessary for the owner of land to procure the drilling of wells on his land in order to prevent drainage of valuable oil therefrom by wells located on adjacent lands. Layman v. Hodnett, 205 Ark. 367, 168 S.W.2d 819 (1943) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 28; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-847.

28-65-306. Enforcement of contracts.

When, prior to his or her incapacity, an incapacitated person has entered into a valid contract for the purchase or sale of any interest in real or personal property, including the sale or relinquishment of a dower or homestead interest, and the contract has not been performed prior to the inception of incapacitation, the court, upon petition of the guardian, the seller or purchaser, or other interested person, if it finds that performance of the contract would have been required on the part of the incapacitated person if the incapacitation had not intervened, may authorize the guardian to complete the performance of the contract and to execute or join in the execution of the deed of conveyance, bill of sale, or other appropriate instrument in the name and in behalf of the incapacitated person pursuant to the terms of the original contract.

The conveyance, bill of sale, or other instrument shall have the same effect with respect to the estate, title, or interest of the incapacitated person as if executed by him or her personally while incapacitated.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 29; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-848.

28-65-307. Continuation of business — Liability.

If, at the time of the appointment of a guardian of the estate, the ward owns a business or an interest in a business, the court, by appropriate order, may authorize the guardian to continue the conduct of or participation in such a business in behalf of the ward for such periods of time and subject to such safeguards as the court may find to be for the best interest of the ward.

The ward's estate, but not the guardian personally, shall be liable for damages resulting from torts or other acts committed by agents and employees of the guardian in the course of their employment in the conduct of the business.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 30; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-849.